Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.112

Report on rule-making activity.

(1) The code reviser shall compile and publish on a quarterly basis a report on state agency rule-making activity. The report shall summarize the following information by agency and by type of activity for new, amended, and repealed rules adopted by state agencies pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW:

(a) The number adopted, proposed for adoption, and withdrawn;

(b) The number adopted as emergency rules;

(c) The number adopted in order to comply with federal statute, with federal rules or standards, and with recently enacted state statutes;

(d) The number adopted at the request of a nongovernmental entity;

(e) The number adopted on an agency's own initiative;

(f) The number adopted in order to clarify, streamline, or reform agency procedures;

(g) The number of petitions for review of rules received by agencies;

(h) The number of rules appealed to superior court; and

(i) The number adopted using negotiated rule making, pilot rule making, or other alternative rule-making mechanisms.

(2) For purposes of the report required by this section, each Washington State Register filing section shall be considered as a separate rule. The code reviser may adopt rules necessary to implement this section. To the maximum extent practicable, the code reviser shall use information supplied on forms provided by state agencies pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW to prepare the report required by this section.

[ 1995 c 403 s 704.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.